Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3406
Committee; chairman; meetings.

The President of Nebraska Poultry Industries, Inc. shall be chairman of the committee. The committee shall meet at least once every three months and at such other times as called by the chairman, the director, or by any three members of the committee.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 6.
December 31, 2027